New Jersey, session 221, S4354.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Public utility means the same as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13. Surcharge means an additional amount imposed by a public utility at the time of a payment transaction that increases a charge to a public utility customer to recover the cost of the public utilitys use of third-party payment processing services. b.    A public utility shall not impose a surcharge on any public utility customer who has not enrolled in automatic payments through the public utility and, instead, has elected to make an alternative form of payment to the public utility for services rendered to that customer by the public utility.  Alternative forms of payment shall include one-time payments made by a public utility customer via: (1) an online credit card transaction; (2) an online debit card transaction; (3) an automated telephone system; or (4) a direct withdrawal from the customers bank account. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.